Mississippi, session 2026, SB2270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-5-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-5-33.  (1)  Subject to the limitations imposed on wheel and axle loads by Section 63-5-27, and to the further limitations hereinafter specified, the total combined weight (vehicles plus load) on any group of axles of a vehicle or a combination of vehicles shall not exceed the value given in the following table (Table III) corresponding to the distance in feet between the extreme axles of the group, measured longitudinally to the nearest foot, on those highways or parts of highways designated by the Mississippi Transportation Commission as being capable of carrying the maximum load limits and, in addition thereto, such other highways or parts of highways found by the commission to be suitable to carry the maximum load limits from an engineering standpoint, and so designated as such by order of the commission entered upon its minutes and published once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a daily newspaper published in this state and having a general circulation therein.  The maximum total combined weight carried on any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles shall be determined by the formula contained in the Federal Weight Law enacted January 4, 1975, as follows:  W=500 (LN/N-1+12N+36) where W=maximum weight in pounds carried on any group of two (2) or more axles computed to the nearest five hundred (500) pounds, L=distance in feet between the extremes of any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles, and N=number of axles in any group under consideration. TABLE III DISTANCE IN FEET BETWEEN THE EXTREMES OF ANY GROUP OF 2 OR MORE CONSECUTIVE MAXIMUM LOAD IN POUNDS CARRIED ON ANY AXLES               GROUP OF 2 OR MORE CONSECUTIVE AXLES 2 axles   3 axles   4 axles   5 axles   6 axles   7 axles 4     34,000 5     34,000 6     34,000              Axle groups in 7     34,000 8 and less 34,000    34,000    these spacings More than 8     38,000    42,000 9     39,000    42,500 10     40,000    43,500 impractical 11               44,000 12               45,000 50,000 13               45,500 50,500 14               46,500 51,500 15               47,000 52,000 16               48,000 52,500    58,000 17               48,500 53,500    58,500 18               49,500 54,000    59,000 19               50,000 54,500    60,000 20               51,000 55,500    60,500    66,000 21               51,500 56,000    61,000    66,500 22               52,500 56,500    61,500    67,000 23               53,000 57,500    62,500    68,000 24               54,000 58,000    63,000    68,500    74,000 25               54,500 58,500    63,500    69,000    74,500 26               55,500 59,500    64,000    69,500    75,000 27               56,000 60,000    65,000    70,000    75,500 28               57,000 60,500    65,500    71,000    76,500 29               57,500 61,500    66,000    71,500    77,000 30               58,500 62,000    66,500    72,000    77,500 31               59,000 62,500    67,500    72,500    78,000 32               60,000 63,500    68,000    73,000    78,500 33 64,000    68,500    74,000    79,000 34 64,500    69,000    74,500    80,000 35 65,500    70,000    75,000    80,000 36 66,000    70,500    75,500    80,000 37 66,500    71,000    76,000    80,000 38 67,500    71,500    77,000    80,000 39 68,000    72,500    77,500    80,000 40 68,500    73,000    78,000    80,000 41 69,500    73,500    78,500    80,000 42 70,000    74,000    79,000    80,000 43 70,500    75,000    80,000    80,000 44 71,500    75,500    80,000    80,000 45 72,000    76,000    80,000    80,000 46 72,500    76,500    80,000    80,000 47 73,500    77,500    80,000    80,000 48                        74,000 78,000    80,000    80,000 49 74,500    78,500    80,000    80,000 50 75,500    79,000    80,000    80,000 51 76,000    80,000    80,000    80,000 52 76,500    80,000    80,000    80,000 53 77,500    80,000    80,000    80,000 54 78,000    80,000    80,000    80,000 55 78,500    80,000    80,000    80,000 56 79,500    80,000    80,000    80,000 57 80,000    80,000    80,000    80,000 (2)  Moreover, in addition to the per axle weight limitations specified by Section 63-5-27, two (2) consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of thirty-four thousand (34,000) pounds each, providing that the overall distance between the first and last axles of such consecutive sets of tandem axles is thirty-six (36) feet or more, except that, until September 1, 1989, the axle distance for tank trailers, dump trailers and ocean transport container haulers may be thirty (30) feet or more.  Such overall gross weight may not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds, except as provided by this section. (3)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 63-5-27 and/or Section 63-5-29 to the contrary, vehicles hauling products in the manner set forth in this subsection, whether or not such vehicles are operating with a harvest permit, shall be allowed a gross weight of not to exceed forty thousand (40,000) pounds on any tandem.  Vehicles operating without a harvest permit shall be allowed a tolerance not to exceed five percent (5%) above their authorized gross vehicle weight, tandem or axle weight; except that the maximum gross vehicle weight of any such vehicle shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds plus a tolerance thereon of not more than two percent (2%).  Vehicles operating without a harvest permit loading at a point of origin having scales available for weighing the vehicle shall not be eligible for any tolerance over the gross weight limit of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds.  Vehicles operating with a harvest permit shall be allowed a tolerance not to exceed ten percent (10%) above their authorized gross vehicle weight, tandem or axle weight, but the maximum gross vehicle weight of any such vehicle shall not exceed eighty-eight thousand (88,000) pounds.  However, neither the increased weights in this subsection nor any tolerance shall be allowed on federal interstate highways or on other highways where a tolerance is specifically prohibited by the Transportation Commission, the county board of supervisors or the municipal governing authorities as provided for in Section 63-5-27.  The tolerance allowed by this subsection shall only apply to the operation of vehicles from the point of loading to the point of unloading for processing, and to the operation of vehicles hauling sand, gravel, woodchips, wood shavings, sawdust, fill dirt, and agricultural products, and products for recycling or materials for the construction or repair of highways.  The range of such operation shall not exceed a radius of one hundred (100) miles except where the products are being transported for processing within this state. (4)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 63-5-27 and/or Section 63-5-29 to the contrary, vehicles hauling prepackaged products, unloaded at a state port or to be loaded at a state port, which are containerized in such a manner as to make subdivision thereof impractical shall be allowed a gross weight of not to exceed forty thousand (40,000) pounds on any tandem, and a tolerance not to exceed ten percent (10%) above their authorized gross weight, tandem or axle weight; except that the maximum weight of any vehicle shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds plus a tolerance thereon of not more than two percent (2%); however, neither the increased weights in this subsection nor any tolerance shall be allowed on federal interstate highways or on other highways where a tolerance is specifically prohibited by the Transportation Commission, the county board of supervisors or the municipal governing authorities as provided for in Section 63-5-27. (5)  (a)  Vehicles for which a harvest permit has been issued pursuant to Section 27-19-81(4) shall be allowed a gross vehicle weight tolerance of ten percent (10%), not to exceed eighty-eight thousand (88,000) pounds.  However, the board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality may designate the roads, streets and highways under their respective jurisdiction on and along which vehicles for which a harvest permit has been issued may travel.  This subsection shall not apply to the federal interstate system. (b)  Any owner or operator who has been issued a harvest permit and who wishes to operate a vehicle on the roads, streets or highways under the jurisdiction of a county or municipality at a gross vehicle weight greater than the weight allowed by law or greater than the maximum weight established for such roads, streets or highways by the board of supervisors or municipal governing authorities, shall notify, in writing, the board of supervisors or the governing authorities, as the case may be, before operating such vehicle on the roads, streets or highways of such county or municipality.  In the notice, the permit holder shall identify the routes over which the permit holder intends to operate vehicles for which the permit has been issued and the dates or time period during which the person will be operating such vehicles.  The board of supervisors or the governing authorities, as the case may be, shall have two (2) working days to respond in writing to the permit holder to notify the permit holder of the routes on and along which the permit holder may operate vehicles for which a harvest permit has been issued.  Failure of the board of supervisors or the governing authorities timely to notify the permit holder and to designate the routes on and along which the permit holder may operate shall be considered as authorizing the permit holder to operate on any of the roads, streets or highways of the county or municipality in accordance with the authority granted to the permit holder by the harvest permit. (c)  Any time a timber deed is filed with the chancery clerk, the grantee, at that time, may make a written request of the board of supervisors of the county or the governing authorities of the municipality, as the case may be, for the purpose of providing to the grantee, within three (3) working days of the filing of the request, a designated and approved route over the roads, streets or highways under the jurisdiction of the county or city, as the case may be, that the grantee may travel for the purpose of transporting harvested timber.  Upon providing such route designation, the county or city, as the case may be, shall also provide to the grantee a map designating the approved route.  An approved route designation provided to a grantee under the provisions of this paragraph shall be valid for a period of six (6) months from its date of issue.  The permit authorized to be issued under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall not be required for any person who obtains a permit issued under this paragraph. * * *  (d)  This subsection (5) shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2028. (6)  Nothing in this section or subsections (1) through (4) of Section 63-5-27 shall be construed to deny the operation of any vehicle or combination of vehicles that could be lawfully operated upon the interstate highway system of this state on January 4, 1975. (7)  (a)  Notwithstanding any provisions of Section 63-5-27 to the contrary, a vehicle that is operated by an engine fueled primarily by compressed or liquefied natural gas may exceed the gross vehicle weight limits by an amount, not to exceed a maximum of two thousand (2,000) pounds, that is equal to the difference between the weight of the vehicle attributable to the natural gas tank and fueling system carried by the vehicle and the weight of a comparable diesel tank and fueling system. (b)  The weight exception provided in this subsection shall apply to all interstate highways per the exemption expressly permitted by 23 USC Section 127. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.